Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-109] Immunity for market conduct
surveillance personnel. (a) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any
liability be imposed against the commissioner, the commissioner's authorized
representatives, or an examiner appointed by the commissioner for any
statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out this
article.

(b) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall
any liability be imposed against any person for the act of communicating or
delivering information or data to the commissioner, the commissioner's
authorized representative, or the examiner pursuant to an examination made
under this article, if the act of communication or delivery was performed in
good faith and without fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive.

(c) A person identified in subsection (a)
shall be entitled to an award of attorney's fees and costs if the person is the
prevailing party in a civil cause of action for libel, slander, or any other
relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out this article and the
party bringing the action was not substantially justified in doing so. For the
purposes of this section, a proceeding is "substantially justified"
if it had a reasonable basis in law or fact at the time that it was initiated.

(d) This section shall not abrogate or modify
in any way any common law or statutory privilege or immunity heretofore enjoyed
by any person identified in subsection (a). [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next